Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-348
State hospitals for the mentally ill; patients whose legal settlement has not been ascertained; state to bear expense.

Patients in the state hospitals for the mentally ill having no legal settlement in this state, or whose legal settlement cannot be ascertained, shall be supported at the expense of the state. This section shall apply to all such patients now in the hospitals and shall include expenses already incurred and remaining unpaid. The Department of Health and Human Services may authorize the removal of any such patient at the expense of the state.

G.S.1873, c. 31, § 27, p. 417;

R.S.1913, § 7254;

C.S.1922, § 6911;

C.S.1929, § 83-716;

R.S.1943, § 83-348;

Laws 1947, c. 335, § 36, p. 1071;

Laws 1969, c. 818, § 22, p. 3123;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 944;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 789.